California statutes. Probate Code
(j) Whether there is any pending civil action in this state against the guardian or conservator, the ward or conservatee, or the estate.

(k) A statement of the reasons for the transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2804.

At least 30 days before the hearing, the petitioner shall deliver pursuant to Section 1215 a notice of the time and place of the hearing and a copy of the petition to each person required to be listed in the petition at the address stated in the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 54.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2805.

Any of the following may appear and file written objections to the petition:

(a) Any person required to be listed in the petition.

(b) Any creditor of the ward or conservatee or of the estate.

(c) The spouse of the ward or the spouse or domestic partner of the conservatee or any relative or friend of the ward or conservatee.

(d) Any other interested person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2806.

The court may grant the petition and order the guardian or conservator to transfer some or all of the personal property of the estate to the foreign guardian or conservator if the court determines all of the following:

(a) The transfer will promote the best interests of the ward or conservatee and the estate.

(b) The substantial rights of creditors or claimants in this state will not be materially impaired by the transfer.

(c) The foreign guardian or conservator is qualified, willing, and able to administer the property to be transferred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2807.

If a transfer is ordered, the court may direct the manner of transfer and impose such terms and conditions as may be just.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2808.

(a) If the court’s order provides for the transfer of all of the property of the estate to the foreign guardian or conservator, the court, upon settlement of the final account, shall order the guardianship of the estate or the conservatorship of the estate terminated upon the filing with the clerk of the court of a receipt for the property executed by the foreign guardian or conservator.

(b) Unless notice is waived, a copy of the final account of the guardian or conservator and of the petition for discharge, together with a notice of the hearing, shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 at least 30 days before the date of the hearing to all persons required
 to be listed in the petition for transfer, including the foreign guardian or conservator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 55.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Notification to Court by Institutions [2890. - 2893.]

2890.

(a) When a guardian or conservator, pursuant to letters of guardianship or conservatorship of the estate, takes possession or control of any asset of the ward or conservatee held by an institution, as defined in subdivision (c), the institution shall file with the court having jurisdiction of the guardianship or conservatorship a statement containing the following information:

(1) The name of the ward or conservatee.

(2) The name of the guardian or joint guardians or conservator or joint conservators.

(3) The court case number.

(4) The name of the institution.

(5) The address of the institution.

(6) The account number of the account, if any, in which the asset was held by the ward or conservatee.

(7) A description of the asset or assets held by the institution. If an asset is a life insurance policy or annuity, the description shall include the policy number, if available. If the asset is a security listed on a public exchange, the description shall include the name and reference number, if available.

(8) The value, if known, or the estimated value otherwise, of the asset on the date the letters were issued by the court to the guardian or conservator, to the extent this value is routinely provided in the statements from the institution to the owner.

(b) Taking possession or control of an asset includes, for purposes of this chapter, changing title to the asset, withdrawing all or any portion of the asset, or transferring all or any portion of an asset from the institution.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, “institution” means an insurance company, insurance broker, insurance agent, investment company, investment bank, securities broker-dealer, investment adviser, financial planner, financial adviser, or any other person who takes, holds, or controls an asset subject to a conservatorship or guardianship that is not a “financial institution” as defined in Section 2892.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 563, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2891.

(a) The statement filed pursuant to Section 2890 shall be an affidavit by a person having authority to make the statement on behalf of the institution, as defined in Section 2890, and shall include that fact in the statement.

(b) If the affidavit and any accompanying information to be filed pursuant to this section also contains the ward or conservatee’s social security number or any other personal information, including financial information regarding the ward or conservatee which would not be disclosed in an accounting, an inventory and appraisal, or any other nonconfidential pleading filed in the action, the information shall be kept confidential and subject to disclosure to any person only upon order of the court.

(c) This chapter does not apply to any trust arrangement described in subdivision (b) of Section 82 except paragraph (4) of that subdivision relating to assets held in Totten trust.

(d) No fee shall be charged by the court for the filing of the affidavit or related information as required by this section.

(e) The affidavit required by Section 2890 is not required to be filed in a proceeding more than once for each asset. However, all assets held by institutions may be listed in a single affidavit filed with the court.

(f) When a guardian or conservator takes possession or control of an asset in an institution, as defined in Section 2890, the institution may then file with the court the statement required by Section 2890 as to any or all other assets of the ward or conservatee held in the institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 563, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.

(a) When a guardian or conservator, pursuant to letters of guardianship or conservatorship of the estate, opens or changes the name to an account or safe-deposit box in a financial institution, as defined in subdivision (b), the financial institution shall send to the court identified in the letters of guardianship or conservatorship a statement containing the following information:

(1) The name of the person with whom the account or safe-deposit box is opened or changed.

(2) The account number or reference number.

(3) The date the account or safe-deposit box was opened or changed ownership pursuant to letters of guardianship or conservatorship.

(4) If the asset is held in an account in a financial institution, the balance as of the date the account was opened or changed.

(5) If the asset is held in a safe-deposit box, and the financial institution has been given access to the safe-deposit box, a list of the contents, including, for example, currency, coins, jewelry, tableware, insurance policies or certificates, stock certificates, bonds, deeds, and wills.

(6) The name and address of the financial institution in which the asset is maintained.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “financial institution” means a bank, trust, savings and loan association, savings bank, industrial bank, or credit union.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 888, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2893.

(a) The written statement provided pursuant to Section 2892 by the financial institution shall be in the form of an affidavit signed by an officer of the financial institution and the officer shall provide his or her name and title in the affidavit.

(b) The affidavit required by this section is subject to disclosure under the circumstances described in subdivision (l) of Section 7480 of the Government Code under the California Right to Financial Privacy Act (Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 7460) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(c) This chapter does not apply to any trust arrangement described in subdivision (b) of Section 82 except paragraph (4) of that subdivision relating to assets held in a Totten trust.

(d) The affidavit described in Section 2892 is not required to be filed in a proceeding more than once for each asset. However, all assets held by the financial institution may be listed in a single affidavit filed with the court.

(e) If the affidavit and any accompanying information to be filed pursuant to this section also contains the ward or conservatee’s social security number or any other personal information, including financial information regarding the ward or conservatee which would not be disclosed in an accounting, an inventory and appraisal, or other nonconfidential pleading filed in the action, the information shall be kept confidential and subject to disclosure to any person only upon order of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 563, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. PUBLIC GUARDIAN [2900. - 2955.]



  CHAPTER 1. Taking Temporary Possession or Control of Property [2900. - 2903.]

2900.

(a) (1) If the public guardian or public conservator determines that the requirements for appointment of a guardian or conservator of the estate are satisfied and the public guardian or public conservator intends to apply for appointment, the public guardian or public conservator may take possession or control of real or personal property of a person domiciled in the county that is
 subject to loss, injury, waste, or misappropriation, and, subject to subdivision (b), may deny use of, access to, or prohibit residency in, the real or personal property, by anyone who does not have a written rental agreement or other legal right to the use of, or access to, the property.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (C), if the public guardian or public conservator determines that the requirements for appointment of a guardian or conservator of the estate are satisfied and the public guardian or public conservator intends to apply for appointment as the guardian or conservator of a person domiciled in the county, the public guardian or public conservator may restrain any person from transferring, encumbering, or in any way disposing of any real or personal property held in a trust, provided all of the following requirements are met:

(i) The
 real or personal property held in the trust is subject to loss, injury, waste, or misappropriation.

(ii) The proposed ward or conservatee is a settlor of the trust.

(iii) The proposed ward or conservatee has a beneficial interest in the trust to currently receive income or principal from the trust.

(iv) The proposed ward or conservatee holds a power to revoke the trust.

(B) During the period of any restraint under this paragraph, the property subject to the restraint shall continue to be retained as property of the trust pending termination of the restraint or further court order. The public guardian or public conservator shall provide notice of any action taken under this paragraph to all of the persons required to be noticed pursuant to Section 17203,
 to the extent the public guardian or public conservator has access to the trust documents or is otherwise able to determine the persons entitled to receive notice. Any settlor, trustee, or beneficiary may petition the court for relief from any action taken by the public guardian or public conservator under this paragraph.

(C) This paragraph shall not apply if a current trustee or cotrustee is a spouse of the proposed ward or conservatee and that spouse is also a settlor of the trust, unless the public guardian or public conservator determines that the real or personal property held in the trust is subject to substantial loss, injury, waste, or misappropriation.

(b) The authority provided to the public guardian and public conservator in subdivision (a) includes the authority to terminate immediately the occupancy of anyone living in the home of an intended ward or conservatee,
 other than the intended ward or conservatee, and the authority to remove any such occupant residing therein, subject to the following requirements:

(1) The public guardian or public conservator shall first determine that the person whose occupancy is to be terminated has no written rental agreement or other legal right to occupancy, and has caused, contributed to, enabled, or threatened loss, injury, waste, or misappropriation of the home or its contents. In making this determination, the public guardian or public conservator shall contact the intended ward or conservatee and the occupant, advise them of the proposed removal and the grounds therefor, and consider whatever information they provide.

(2) At the time of the removal, the public guardian or public conservator shall advise the intended ward or conservatee and the occupant that a hearing will be held as provided in
 paragraph (3).

(3) The public guardian or public conservator shall file a petition regarding removal, showing the grounds therefor, to be set for hearing within 10 days of the filing of the petition and within 15 days of the removal. The person removed and the intended ward or conservatee shall be personally served with a notice of hearing and a copy of the petition at least five days prior to the hearing, subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 3. The right of the public guardian or public conservator to deny occupancy by the removed person to the premises shall terminate 15 days after removal, unless extended by the court at the hearing on the petition. The court shall not grant an extension unless the public guardian or public conservator has filed a petition for appointment as guardian or conservator of the estate.

(c) If the public guardian or public
 conservator takes possession of the residence of an intended ward or conservatee under this section, then for purposes of Section 602.3 of the Penal Code, the public guardian or public conservator shall be the owner’s representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 370, Sec. 1.   (AB 1288)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2901.

(a) A public guardian who is authorized to take possession or control of property under this chapter may issue a written certification of that fact. The written certification is effective for 30 days after the date of issuance.

(b) The written recordable certification shall substantially comply with the following form:

“CERTIFICATE OF AUTHORITYTHIS IS AN OFFICIAL CERTIFICATE ENTITLING THE PUBLIC GUARDIAN TO TAKE POSSESSION OF ANY AND ALL PROPERTY BELONGING TO THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUAL:
(Name of Individual) _____________
This Certificate of Authority has been issued by the Public Guardian pursuant to and in compliance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 2900) of Part 5 of Division 4 of the California Probate Code. Under California law, this Certificate of Authority authorizes the Public Guardian to take possession or control of property belonging to the above-named individual.
SPECIAL NOTE TO FINANCIAL
 INSTITUTIONS:State law requires that upon receiving a copy of this Certificate of Authority, financial institutions shall provide the public guardian with information concerning property held by the above-named individual and surrender the property to the Public Guardian if requested.
This Certificate of Authority shall only be valid when signed and dated by the Public Guardian or a deputy Public Guardian of the County of _____ and affixed with the official seal of the Public Guardian below.
This Certificate of Authority expires 30 days after the date of issuance.

Signature of Public Guardian: Date:Official Seal”
(c) The public guardian may record a copy of the written certification in any county in which is located real property of which the public guardian is authorized to take possession or control under this chapter.

(d) A financial institution or other person shall, without the necessity of inquiring into the truth of the written certification and without court order or letters being issued:

(1) Provide the public guardian information concerning property held in the sole name of the proposed ward or conservatee.

(2) Surrender to the public guardian property of the proposed ward or conservatee that is subject to loss, injury, waste, or
 misappropriation.

(e) Receipt of the written certification:

(1) Constitutes sufficient acquittance for providing information and for surrendering property of the proposed ward or conservatee.

(2) Fully discharges the financial institution or other person from any liability for any act or omission of the public guardian with respect to the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 370, Sec. 2.   (AB 1288)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2901.5.

(a) A public guardian or public conservator, who is authorized to restrain any person from transferring, encumbering, or in any way disposing of any real or personal property held in a trust in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2900, may issue a written certification of that fact. The written certification is effective for 30 days after the date of issuance.

(b) The written
 recordable certification shall substantially comply with the following form:“CERTIFICATE OF AUTHORITYTHIS IS AN OFFICIAL CERTIFICATE ENTITLING THE PUBLIC GUARDIAN/PUBLIC CONSERVATOR TO RESTRAIN ANY PERSON FROM TRANSFERRING, ENCUMBERING, OR IN ANY WAY DISPOSING OF ANY REAL OR PERSONAL PROPERTY HELD IN THE FOLLOWING TRUST:(Name of Trust) _____________THE PUBLIC GUARDIAN/PUBLIC CONSERVATOR HAS DETERMINED THAT IT HAS AUTHORITY TO ISSUE THIS CERTIFICATE WITH RESPECT TO THE ABOVE-NAMED TRUST AND IN CONNECTION WITH PROCEEDINGS THAT ARE OR WILL BE PENDING RELATED TO THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUAL:(Name of Individual) _____________This Certificate of Authority has been issued by the Public
 Guardian/Public Conservator pursuant to and in compliance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 2900) of Part 5 of Division 4 of the California Probate Code. Under California law, this Certificate of Authority authorizes the Public Guardian/Public Conservator to restrain any person from transferring, encumbering, or in any way disposing of any real or personal property held in the above-named trust.
SPECIAL NOTE TO FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS:State law requires that, upon receiving a copy of this Certificate of Authority, financial institutions shall provide the public guardian/public conservator with information concerning property held in the above-named trust and shall restrain any person from transferring, encumbering, or in any way disposing of any real or personal property held in the above-named trust.
This Certificate of Authority shall only be valid when signed and dated by the Public Guardian/Public Conservator or a deputy Public Guardian/Public Conservator of the County of _____ and affixed with the official seal of the Public Guardian/Public Conservator below.
This Certificate of Authority expires 30 days after the date of issuance.
Signature of Public Guardian/Public Conservator:Date:Official Seal”

(c) The public guardian or public conservator may record a copy of the written certification in any county in which is located real property held in a trust as to which the
 public guardian or public conservator has determined it has authority to issue the written certification.

(d) A financial institution or other person who is provided with the written certification by the public guardian or public conservator shall, without the necessity of inquiring into the truth of the written certification and without court order or letters being issued:

(1) Provide the public guardian or public conservator information concerning any real or personal property held in the trust identified in the written certification.

(2) Restrain any person from transferring, encumbering, or in any way disposing of any real or personal property, held in the trust identified in the written certification.

(e) Receipt of the written certification:

(1) Constitutes sufficient acquittance for providing information and for restraining any person from transferring, encumbering, or in any way disposing of any real or personal property held in the trust identified in the written certification.

(2) Fully discharges the financial institution or other person from any liability for any act or omission of the public guardian or public conservator with respect to the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 370, Sec. 3.   (AB 1288)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2902.

A public guardian who takes possession or control of property pursuant to this chapter is entitled to reasonable costs incurred for the preservation of the property, together with reasonable compensation for services, in case of the subsequent appointment of another person as guardian or conservator of the estate. The costs and compensation are a proper and legal charge against the estate of the ward or conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2903.

This chapter applies only to possession or control of property by a public guardian on or after July 1, 1989. Possession or control of property by a public guardian before July 1, 1989, is governed by the applicable law in effect before July 1, 1989, notwithstanding its repeal by Chapter 1199 of the Statutes of 1988.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Prefiling Investigation by Public Guardian [2910. - 2911.]

2910.

(a) Upon a showing of probable cause to believe that a person is in substantial danger of abuse or neglect and needs a conservator of the person, the estate, or the person and estate for his or her own protection, the public guardian or the county’s adult protective services agency may petition for either or both of the orders of the court provided in subdivision (b) in connection with his or her investigation to determine whether a petition for the appointment of the public guardian as conservator of the person, estate, or the person and estate of the person would be necessary or appropriate.

(b) The petition may request either or both of the following orders for the limited purposes of the investigation concerning a person:

(1) An order authorizing identified health care providers or organizations to provide private medical information about the person to the public guardian’s authorized representatives.

(2) An order authorizing identified financial institutions or advisers, accountants, and others with financial information about the person to provide the information to the public guardian’s authorized representatives.

(c) Notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition shall be served on the person who is the subject of the investigation in the manner and for the period required by Section 1460 or, on application of the public guardian contained in or accompanying the petition, on an expedited basis in the manner and for the period ordered by the court. The court may dispense with notice of the hearing only on a showing of facts demonstrating an immediate threat of substantial harm to the person if notice is given.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 553, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2911.

A court order issued in response to a public guardian’s petition pursuant to Section 2910 shall do all of the following:

(a) Authorize health care providers to disclose a person’s confidential medical information as permitted under California law, and also authorize disclosure of the information under federal medical privacy regulations enacted pursuant to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.

(b) Direct the public guardian or the adult protective services agency to keep the information acquired under the order confidential, except as disclosed in a judicial proceeding or as required by law enforcement or an authorized regulatory agency.

(c) Direct the public guardian or the adult protective services agency to destroy all copies of written information obtained under the order or give them to the person who was the subject of the investigation if a conservatorship proceeding is not commenced within 60 days after the date of the order. The court may extend this time period as the court finds to be in the subject’s best interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 553, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Appointment of Public Guardian [2920. - 2923.]

2920.

(a) If any person domiciled in the county requires a guardian or conservator and there is no one else who is qualified and willing to act and whose appointment as guardian or conservator would be in the best interests of the person, then either of the following shall apply:

(1) The public guardian shall apply for appointment as guardian or conservator of the person, the estate, or the person and estate, if there is an imminent threat to the person’s health or safety or the person’s estate.

(2) The public guardian may apply for appointment as guardian or conservator of the person, the estate, or the person and estate in all other cases.

(b) The public guardian shall apply for appointment as guardian or conservator of the person, the estate, or the person and estate, if the court so orders. The court may make an order under this subdivision on motion of an interested person or on the court’s own motion in a pending proceeding or in a proceeding commenced for that purpose. The court shall order the public guardian to apply for appointment as guardian or conservator of the person, the estate, or the person and estate, on behalf of any person domiciled in the county who appears to require a guardian or conservator, if it appears that there is no one else who is qualified and willing to act, and if that appointment as guardian or conservator appears to be in the best interests of the person. However, if prior to the filing of the petition for appointment it is discovered that there is someone else who is qualified and willing to act as guardian or conservator, the public guardian shall be relieved of the duty under the order. The court shall not make an order under this subdivision except after notice to the public guardian for the period and in the manner provided for in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1, consideration of the alternatives, and a determination by the court that the appointment is necessary. The notice and hearing under this subdivision may be combined with the notice and hearing required for appointment of a guardian or conservator.

(c) The public guardian shall begin an investigation within two business days of receiving a referral for conservatorship or guardianship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 493, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2921.

An application of the public guardian for guardianship or conservatorship of the person, the estate, or the person and estate, of a person who is under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services shall not be granted without the written consent of the department having jurisdiction of the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 50.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2922.

If the public guardian is appointed as guardian or conservator:

(a) Letters shall be issued in the same manner and by the same proceedings as letters are issued to other persons. Letters may be issued to “the public guardian” of the county without naming the public guardian.

(b) The official bond and oath of the public guardian are in lieu of the guardian or conservator’s bond and oath on the grant of letters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2923.

On or before January 1, 2008, the public guardian shall comply with the continuing education requirements that are established by the California State Association of Public Administrators, Public Guardians, and Public Conservators.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 493, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Administration by Public Guardian [2940. - 2944.]

2940.

All funds coming into the custody of the public guardian shall be deposited or invested in the same manner and subject to the same terms and conditions as deposit or investment by the public administrator of money in an estate pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 7640) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 7.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2941.

The public guardian may, if necessary and in the public guardian’s discretion, employ private attorneys where the cost of employment can be defrayed out of estate funds or where satisfactory pro bono or contingency fee arrangements can be made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2942.

The public guardian shall be paid from the estate of the ward or conservatee for all of the following:

(a) Reasonable expenses incurred in the execution of the guardianship or conservatorship.

(b) Compensation for services of the public guardian and the attorney of the public guardian, and for the filing and processing services of the county clerk or the clerk of the superior court, in the amount the court determines is just and reasonable. In determining what constitutes just and reasonable compensation, the court shall, among other factors, take into consideration the actual costs of the services provided, the amount of the estate involved, the special value of services provided in relation to the estate, and whether the compensation requested might impose an economic hardship on the estate. Nothing in this section shall require a public guardian to base a request for compensation upon an hourly rate of service.

(c) An annual bond fee in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25) plus one-fourth of 1 percent of the amount of an estate greater than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The amount charged shall be deposited in the county treasury. This subdivision does not apply if the ward or conservatee is eligible for Social Security Supplemental Income benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 866, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2943.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 2610, the property described in the inventory may be appraised by the public guardian and need not be appraised by a probate referee if the public guardian files with the inventory an appraisal showing that the estimated value of the property in the estate does not exceed the amount prescribed in Section 13100.

(b) If the conservator seeks authority pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2540 to sell the conservatee’s personal residence, whether or not it is real property, or if the conservator seeks authority pursuant to Section 2590 to sell the conservatee’s real property, valued in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or an item of personal property valued in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) that is not a security sold pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2544, that property shall be appraised by a probate referee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 86, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2944.

The public guardian is not liable for failing to take possession or control of property that is beyond the ability of the public guardian to possess or control.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Financial Abuse of Mentally Impaired Elders [2950. - 2955.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [2950. - 2951.]

2950.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to do all of the following:

(1) Reduce the incidence of financial abuse perpetrated against mentally impaired elder adults.

(2) Minimize monetary losses to mentally impaired elder adults as a result of financial abuse.

(3) Facilitate timely intervention by law enforcement, in collaboration with the public guardian, to effectively protect mentally impaired elder adult victims of financial abuse, and to recover their assets.

(b) Any peace officer or public guardian of a county that has both of the following, as determined by the public guardian of that county, may take the actions authorized by this chapter:

(1) The existence of sufficient law enforcement personnel with expertise in the assessment of competence.

(2) The existence of a law enforcement unit devoted to investigating elder financial abuse and the enforcement of laws applicable to elder abuse.

(c) This chapter shall be coordinated with existing mandated programs affecting financial abuse of mentally impaired elders that are administered by the adult protective services agency of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 813, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2951.

The definitions contained in this section shall govern the construction of this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.

(a) “Declaration” means a document that substantially complies with the requirements of Section 2954, and is signed by both a peace officer and a supervisor from the county’s adult protective services agency and provided to the public guardian in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 2952.

(b) “Elder person” means any person residing in this state, 65 years of age or older.

(c) “Financial abuse” means a situation described in Section 15610.30 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) “Financial abuse POST training” means an elder financial abuse training course certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(e) “Financial institution” means any bank, savings and loan, thrift, industrial loan company, credit union, or any branch of any of these institutions doing business in the state, as defined by provisions of the Financial Code.

(f) “Peace officer” means a sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal police officer, or a peace officer authorized under subdivision (b) of Section 830.1 of the Penal Code, duly sworn under the requirements of state law, who satisfies any of the following requirements:

(1) The sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal police officer, or peace officer authorized under subdivision (b) of Section 830.1 of the Penal Code has completed or participated as a lecturer in a financial abuse POST training program within the last 36 months. The completion of the course may be satisfied by telecourse, video training tape, or other instruction. The training shall, at a minimum, address relevant elder abuse laws, recognition of financial abuse and fraud, assessment of mental competence in accordance with the standards set forth in Part 17 (commencing with Section 810) of the Probate Code, reporting requirements and procedures for the investigation of financial abuse and related crimes, including neglect, and civil and criminal procedures for the protection of victims. The course may be presented as part of a training program that includes other subjects or courses.

(2) The sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal police officer, or peace officer authorized under subdivision (b) of Section 830.1 of the Penal Code, has consulted with a sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal police officer, or peace officer authorized under subdivision (b) of Section 830.1 of the Penal Code, who satisfies the requirements of paragraph (1) concerning the declaration defined in subdivision (a) and obtained the signature of that sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal police officer, or peace officer authorized under subdivision (b) of Section 830.1 of the Penal Code on a declaration that substantially complies with the form described in Section 2954.

(g) “Property” means all personal property and real property of every kind belonging to, or alleged to belong to, the elder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 813, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Estate Protection [2952. - 2955.]

2952.

(a) A peace officer may issue a declaration, as provided in Section 2954, concerning an elder person if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) There is probable cause to believe that the elder person is substantially unable to manage his or her financial resources or to resist fraud or undue influence.

(2) There exists a significant danger that the elder person will lose all or a portion of his or her
 property as a result of fraud or misrepresentations or the mental incapacity of the elder person.

(3) There is probable cause to believe that a crime is being committed against the elder person.

(4) The crime is connected to the inability of the elder person to manage his or her financial resources or to resist fraud or undue influence, and that inability is the result of deficits in the elder person’s mental functions.

(5) The peace officer has consulted with an individual qualified to perform a mental status examination.

(b) If the requirements of subdivision (a) are satisfied, the peace officer may provide a signed declaration to the public guardian of the county. The declaration provided by the peace officer under this subdivision shall be signed by
 both the peace officer and a supervisor from the county’s adult protective services agency. The declaration shall be transmitted to the public guardian within 24 hours of its being signed, and may be transmitted by facsimile.

(c) (1) Upon receiving a signed declaration from a peace officer, the public guardian is authorized to rely on the information contained in the declaration to take immediate possession or control of any real or personal property belonging to the elder person referred to in the declaration, including any property that is held jointly between the elder person and a third party that is subject to loss, injury, waste, or misappropriation, and may issue a written recordable certification of that fact pursuant to this section. The written recordable certification shall substantially comply with the following form:

“CERTIFICATE OF AUTHORITY

THIS IS AN OFFICIAL CERTIFICATE ENTITLING THE PUBLIC GUARDIAN TO TAKE POSSESSION OF ANY AND ALL PROPERTY BELONGING TO THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUAL:
(Name of Victim) _____________
